District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0346.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
20 act may be cited as the "Medical Cannabis Conditional Licensure Extension Amendment Act of
21 2025".
22 Sec. 2. Section 7 of the Legalization of Marijuana for Medical Treatment Initiative of
23 1999, effective July 27, 2010 (D.C. Law 18-210; D.C. Official Code§ 7-1671.06), is amended as
24 follows:
25 (a) Subsection (k) is amended as follows:
26 (1) Paragraph (1) is amended by striking the phrase "a 2-year conditional license"
27 and inserting the phrase "a conditional license valid for up to 3 years" in its place.
28 (2) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the phrase "shall have 2 years from the
29 date of ABC Board approval" and inserting the phrase "shall have until the end of the term of the
30 conditional license" in its place.
31 (3) Paragraph (4) is amended by striking the phrase "after a period of 2 years" and
32 inserting the phrase "before the end of the term of the conditional licenses" in its place.
1

33 (b) Subsection (k-1) is amended to read as follows:
34 "(k-1) A one-year conditional license that was in effect as of December 17, 2024, and
35 that automatically converted to a 2-year conditional license, shall automatically convert to a 3-
36 year conditional license, expiring 2 years after the date the original conditional license was set to
37 expire, at no additional cost and without additional ABC Board approval.".
38 (c) Subsection (l) is amended by striking the phrase "A one-year conditional license" and
39 inserting the phrase "A conditional license" in its place.
40 Sec. 3. Applicability.
41 This act shall apply as of June 28, 2025.
42 Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
43 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
44 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 197 5,
45 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code§ 1-301.47a).
46 Sec. 5. Effective date.
4 7 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor ( or in the event of veto by the
48 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
49 provided in section 602( c )( 1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
50 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code§ 1-206.02(c)(l)), and publication in the District of
51 Columbia Register.
2

Government of the District of Columbia
Office of the Chief Financial Officer
* * *
Glen Lee
Chief Financial Officer
MEMORANDUM
TO: The Honorable Phil Mendelson
Chairman, Council of the District of Columbi/J
J&---
p
FROM: J::______.
~~::fLF::ancial Officer
DATE: August 15, 2025
SUBJECT: Fiscal Impact Statement -Medical Cannabis Conditional Licensure
Extension Amendment Act of 2025(including emergency and
temporary versions)
REFERENCE: Draft Introduction as provided to the Office of Revenue Analysis on July
7, 2025
Conclusion
Funds are sufficient in the proposed revised fiscal year 2025 budget and proposed fiscal year 2026
through fiscal year 2029 budget and financial plan to implement the bill.
Background
The Alcoholic Beverage and Cannabis Administration (ABCA) regulates and oversees the medical
cannabis program in the District of Columbia, including issuing patient cards, regulating medical
cannabis distributors, and enforcement of all laws related to medical cannabis. The closure of illegal,
unlicensed cannabis retailers has increased demand for regulated medical cannabis products.
Several new cannabis cultivation centers are operating under conditional licenses and plan to apply
for manufacturing licenses. The bill would extend conditional cultivation and manufacturing licenses
for an additional two years .. The bill also extends conditional licenses in the categories of medical
cannabis cultivation center, retailer, internet retailer, manufacturer, courier, and testing laboratory
from two years to four years.
Financial Plan Impact
Funds are sufficient in the proposed revised fiscal year 2025 budget and proposed fiscal year 2026
through fiscal year 2029 budget and financial plan to implement the bill. ABCA can continue to
regulate licensees and process applications under the new timelines.
1350 Pennsylvania Avenue, NW, Suite 203, Washington, DC 20004 (202)727-2476
www.cfo.dc.gov

GOVERNMENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
***
BRJAN L. SCHWALB PRIVILEGED AND CONFIDENTIAL
ATTORNEY GENERAL ATTORNEY-CLIENT COMMUNICATION
LEGAL COUNSEL DIVISION
MEMORANDUM
TO: Tomas Talamante
Director
Office of Policy and Legislative Affairs
FROM: Adele El-Khouri
Deputy Attorney General
Legal Counsel Division
DATE: September 12, 2025
SUBJECT: Legal Sufficiency Review of Draft "Medical Cannabis Conditional License Extension
Emergency Amendment Act of 2025," "Medical Cannabis Conditional License
Extension Temporary Amendment Act of 2025," "Medical Cannabis Conditional
License Extension Amendment Act of 2025," and "Medical Cannabis Conditional
License Extension Emergency Declaration Resolution of 2025"
(AE-25-325 F)
This is to Certify that this Office has reviewed the above-referenced draft
legislation and found it to be legally sufficient. If you have any questions in this regard, please do
not hesitate to call me at (202) 262-6402.
Adele El-Khouri
3